Utah statutes.
72-4-136.   State highways -- SR-301 to SR-304, SR-306, SR-309, SR-310.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-301.  From the boat ramp at Steinaker State Park northeasterly to Route 191 near the north end of Steinaker Reservoir.

(2)  SR-302.  From Route 32 near the south end of Rockport Reservoir northwesterly to a point near the north boundary of Rockport State Park.

(3)  SR-303.  From the Goblin Valley Overlook northerly to the Goblin Valley State Park north boundary.

(4)  SR-304.  From the parking lot at the beach area in Hyrum State Park northwesterly to a junction with Center Street and Fifth South Street in Hyrum City.

(5)  SR-306.  From the parking area north to Route 66 near the north end of East Canyon Lake State Park.

(6)  SR-309.  From a local road northerly to the parking area at Millsite Lake State Park.

(7)  SR-310.  From Route 21 northerly to the parking area at Minersville Lake State Park.



Amended by Chapter 79, 2006 General Session

